Illinois, session 104th, SB1611.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 5-1.7 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-1.7 new)7    Sec. 5-1.7. Eligibility; State coverage. 8    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, if 9the United States Supreme Court holds Title I, Subtitle A, 10Section 2711 of Public Law 111-148 to be unconstitutional, or 11if a holding of Public Law 111-148 makes Medicaid eligibility 12allowed under Section 2711 inoperable, then the Department of 13Healthcare and Family Services shall, subject to 14appropriation, fully cover the costs of medical assistance for 15individuals affected by the holding or loss of eligibility 16under Title I, Subtitle A, Section 2711 of Public Law 111-148.17    (b) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 18not require individuals receiving medical assistance to work a 19minimum amount of hours in order to receive benefits.